Louisiana, session 2026, HB1034.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:329.9 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§329.9. Temporary protection zones; establishment; penalties
A. The parish president, mayor, sheriff, chief of police, or chief executive
officer of a political subdivision may, when necessary to ensure public safety, issue
a proclamation that establishes one or more temporary protection zones within the
territorial jurisdiction of the political subdivision. A temporary protection zone may
include highways, shorelines, waterways, or other areas within the jurisdiction of the
issuing authority.
B.(1) Any proclamation that establishes a temporary protection zone shall
be in writing and contain all of the following:
(a) The circumstances that necessitate the establishment of the temporary
protection zone.
(b) The geographic boundaries of the temporary protection zone, with
sufficient specificity to provide reasonable notice to the public.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1034 ENROLLED
(c) The date and time when the proclamation of the temporary protection
zone takes effect.
(d) A description of the restrictions on access to or activity within the
temporary protection zone.
(2) The proclamation shall be given prompt and general publicity and shall
be filed with the clerk of court's office.
C. A temporary protection zone established pursuant to this Section shall
remain in effect only as long as necessary to ensure the security of the area and shall
not remain in effect for longer than seventy-two hours from the date and time of
issuance. Nothing in this Section prohibits the issuing authority from establishing
a new temporary protection zone upon the expiration of a previously established
zone, provided that the establishment of the zone is still warranted pursuant to
Subsection A of this Section.
D. A person who, after being advised of the establishment of a temporary
protection zone pursuant to this Section, violates any provision of the proclamation
that established the zone or any lawful directive given by a law enforcement officer
relating to the enforcement of the zone shall be punished as follows:
(1) If the violation involves the wrongful use of public property, the offender
shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars or imprisoned for not more than six
months, or both.
(2) If the violation involves serious bodily injury or property damage in
excess of five thousand dollars, the offender shall be imprisoned at hard labor for not
more than five years.
(3) If the violation involves the death of any person, the offender shall be
imprisoned at hard labor for not more than twenty-one years.
E. This Section does not grant a parish president, mayor, sheriff, chief of
police, or chief executive officer of a political subdivision the authority to act in a
manner inconsistent with R.S. 40:1796.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1034 ENROLLED
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.